Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.803

Model standards for canine fentanyl detection.

By July 1, 2025, the commission shall develop model standards for the training and certification of canine teams to detect fentanyl. When developing the model standards, the commission shall consult with:

(1) Experts including public and private organizations that train canines to imprint on controlled substances;

(2) Law enforcement or correctional agencies that use canines to detect controlled substances;

(3) Experts on the training of canines for use by law enforcement; and

(4) Licensed medical professionals and veterinarians, to the extent reasonably available, with expertise in: (a) Developing and implementing protocols to minimize exposure of canines and their handlers to opioids and their derivatives, including fentanyl and its derivatives; (b) detecting clinical signs of such exposure; and (c) intervening with timely and appropriate medical and veterinary medical treatment in the field, during stabilization and transport, and in-hospital following exposure to opioids and their derivatives, including fentanyl and its derivatives.

[ 2024 c 305 s 1.]